Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1510
Director; voluntary compliance; records.

(1) The director shall make every effort to obtain voluntary compliance through warning, conference, or any other appropriate means prior to initiating enforcement proceedings, except that such requirement shall not be construed to alter enforcement duties or requirements of the director and the department.

(2) The director may require the maintenance of records relating to the operation of disposal systems, and any authorized representative of the director may examine and copy any such records or memoranda pertaining to the operation of disposal systems. Copies of such records shall be submitted to the director upon request.

Laws 1971, LB 939, § 10;

Laws 1972, LB 1435, § 9;

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 86.